Nevada, session 83, SB234.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that federal financial participation is
available, the Director shall include under Medicaid pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 1396b(v)(2) and 42 C.F.R. § 440.255 coverage for care
that is necessary to treat an emergency medical condition of a
resident of this State who is less than 21 years of age and would
otherwise be ineligible for Medicaid solely because of his or her
immigration status. The coverage provided pursuant to this section
must consist of coverage for:
(a) Emergency medical transportation services directly relating
to the treatment of the emergency medical condition;
(b) Care to treat the emergency medical condition provided in
an emergency room or similar setting in a hospital or an
independent center for emergency medical care;
(c) Inpatient services provided to a person immediately
following the admission of the person from an emergency room,
independent center for emergency medical care, clinic or other
similar setting where the person originally sought care for his or
her emergency medical condition, if the inpatient services directly
relate to the treatment of the emergency medical condition;
(d) If approved by the Department pursuant to subsection 3:
(1) Care that is provided in a facility for skilled nursing or
other similar facility for treatment in a community setting
following the discharge of a person from a hospital where the
person was receiving inpatient services, if the care directly relates
to the emergency medical condition for which the person received
care before the discharge;
-
*SB234_R1*

– 3 –
(2) Dialysis provided in a hospital or a facility for the
treatment of irreversible renal disease;
(3) The transplant of bone marrow, if the person:
(I) Has been diagnosed with cancer;
(II) Is currently receiving treatment for the cancer; and
(III) Is a candidate for a bone marrow transplant;
(4) Other care that is medically necessary to treat any stage
of cancer or to prevent the recurrence of cancer, whether provided
on an inpatient or outpatient basis, including, without limitation,
surgery, chemotherapy, radiation therapy, targeted therapy and
immunotherapy; and
(5) The transplant of a kidney, if the person:
(I) Has been diagnosed with end-stage renal disease;
(II) Is receiving dialysis services; and
(III) Is a candidate for a kidney transplant; and
(e) Any follow-up services that are included within a payment
for a service described in paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive.
2. The Director shall not include under Medicaid coverage
pursuant to this section for any care or service not described in
subsection 1, including, without limitation:
(a) Elective surgery;
(b) Prescription drugs, unless dispensed or administered by a
provider of health care as part of the care or treatment described
in subsection 1;
(c) Preventive care;
(d) Rehabilitative services;
(e) Personal care services;
(f) Physical, occupational or speech therapy;
(g) Case management services;
(h) Prosthetics, orthotics, durable medical equipment or
medical supplies;
(i) Dental services;
(j) Hospice care;
(k) Treatment for substance use disorder;
(l) Services for routine prenatal care;
(m) Except as otherwise provided by subparagraphs (3) and (5)
of paragraph (d) of subsection 1, organ transplants and stem cell
transplants; and
(n) Except as otherwise provided by subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (d) of subsection 1, continuing care, including, without
limitation, care and services provided by a facility for the
dependent.
3. The Department may not provide coverage under Medicaid
pursuant to this section for the care described in paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 unless the Department determines, before the care
-
*SB234_R1*

– 4 –
being rendered, that such care is medically necessary and
appropriate, based on the condition of the person to whom the
care may be provided. To provide coverage for the care described
in subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the
Department must additionally determine that the care is necessary
to prevent the condition of the person from rapidly becoming an
emergency medical condition.
4. The Department shall:
(a) Apply for any waiver of federal law or apply for any
amendment to the State Plan for Medicaid that is necessary to
obtain federal financial participation to pay for the cost of
coverage provided under this section.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
(c) Establish procedures for granting prior approval of
coverage for the care described in paragraph (d) of subsection 1.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency medical condition” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(v)(3).
(b) “Emergency medical transportation services” means
emergency medical transportation services provided by an
ambulance, air ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting agency,
including, without limitation, services provided by emergency
medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians
and paramedics in prestabilizing patients and preparing patients
for transport.
(c) “Facility for skilled nursing” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 449.0039.
(d) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(e) “Facility for the treatment of irreversible renal disease”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0046.
(f) “Independent center for emergency medical care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.013.
(g) “Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent physician would provide to a patient to
prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease or any
symptom thereof, that are necessary and which are:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted
standards of medical practice;
(2) Clinically appropriate for the type, frequency, extent,
location and duration;
-
*SB234_R1*

– 5 –
(3) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the
patient, physician or other provider of health care;
(4) Required to improve a specific health condition of the
patient or to preserve the existing state of health of the patient;
and
(5) The most clinically appropriate level of health care that
may be safely provided to the patient.
(h) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to 432.133, inclusive,
432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to 444.430, inclusive,
and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all other provisions of
law relating to the functions of the divisions of the Department, but
is not responsible for the clinical activities of the Division of Public
and Behavioral Health or the professional line activities of the other
divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
-
*SB234_R1*

– 6 –
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 2.5. 1. On or before January 1, 2026, the Director of
Department of Health and Human Services shall:
(a) Identify the specific services which are most commonly
provided by clinics in this State to recipients of Medicaid for the
treatment of pediatric cancer and rare childhood diseases; and
(b) Submit to the United States Secretary of Health and Human
Services a request to amend the State Plan for Medicaid to increase
the rate of reimbursement by not less than 2 percent, or as close to
that amount as the Secretary approves, for each service identified
pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. The request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
supported using methods for determining reimbursement rates
accepted by the Secretary.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 2.5 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
-
*SB234_R1*

– 7 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB234_R1*